Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.240

Washington professional educator standards board—Reports.

(1) By December 1, 2003, and annually thereafter, the Washington professional educator standards board shall prepare a report that includes the following information:

(a) The range of scores on the basic skills assessment under RCW 28A.410.220(1) for persons who passed the assessment and were admitted to a Washington preparation program; and

(b) The range of scores on the subject assessments under *RCW 28A.410.220(2) for persons who passed the assessments and earned an endorsement.

(2) The information under subsection (1) of this section shall be reported for the individual public and private colleges and universities in Washington, as well as reported on an aggregate basis. The report shall also include results disaggregated demographically. The report shall include information on the number and percentage of candidates exempted from assessments, demographic information on candidates exempted, institutions attended and endorsements sought by exempted candidates, and reasons for exclusion from the required assessments. The report shall be made available through the state library, on the website of the office of superintendent of public instruction, and placed on the legislative alert list.

[ 2000 c 39 s 203.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.410.220 was amended by 2008 c 176 s 2, changing subsection (2) to subsection (3).

Findings—Part headings and section captions not law—2000 c 39: See notes following RCW 28A.410.200.